Vermont, session 2025-2026, S312.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5930ll is amended to read:
§ 5930ll. MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT TAX CREDIT
* * *
(c) Amount of credit. Except as limited by subsections (e) and (f) of this
section, a qualified taxpayer shall be entitled to claim against its Vermont
VT LEG #385566 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.312
2026 Page 2 of 4
income tax a credit in an amount equal to ten 10 percent of the total qualified
capital expenditures.
(d) Availability of credit.
(1) The credit earned under this section with respect to qualified capital
expenditures shall be available to reduce the qualified taxpayer’s Vermont
income tax liability for its tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2012, or, if
later, the first tax year within which the qualified taxpayer’s aggregate
qualified capital expenditures exceed $20,000,000.00. A taxpayer claiming a
credit under this subchapter shall submit with the first return on which a credit
is claimed a copy of the qualified taxpayer’s certification from the Vermont
Economic Progress Council.
(2)(A) The credit may be used in the year earned or carried forward to
reduce the qualified taxpayer’s Vermont income tax liability in succeeding tax
years ending on or before December 31, 2030 2034.
(B) If the credit earned under this section reduces the qualified
taxpayer’s Vermont income tax liability in a year by more than 100 percent,
the taxpayer may elect to have up to $500,000.00 of the excess credit amount
refunded. If a refund election is made under this subdivision (B), any
remaining credit amount after the refund shall be carried forward to reduce the
qualified taxpayer’s Vermont income tax liability in succeeding tax years
ending on or before December 31, 2034.
VT LEG #385566 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.312
2026 Page 3 of 4
(e) Limitations.
(1) The credit earned under this section, either alone or in combination
with any other credit allowed by this chapter, may not be applied to reduce the
qualified taxpayer’s Vermont income tax liability in any one year by more than
80 percent, and in no event shall the credit reduce the taxpayer’s income tax
liability below any minimum tax imposed by this chapter. [Repealed.]
(2) The total amount of credit authorized under this section shall be
$8,000,000.00, and in no event shall the credit in any one tax year exceed
$1,000,000.00. The credit shall be available on a first-come, first-served basis
by certification of the Vermont Economic Progress Council pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section.
* * *
(g) Reporting.
(1) Any qualified taxpayer who has been certified under subsection (b)
of this section shall file a report with the Vermont Economic Progress Council
on a form prescribed by the Council for this purpose and provide a copy of the
report to the Commissioner of Taxes.
(2) The report shall be filed for each year following the certification
until the year following the last year the taxpayer claims the credit to reduce its
Vermont income tax liability, or 2031 2035, whichever occurs first.
VT LEG #385566 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.312
2026 Page 4 of 4
(3) The report shall be filed by the due date of the taxpayer’s tax return,
including extensions, in each year for activity the previous calendar year and
include, at a minimum:
(A) the number of full-time jobs in each quarter and the average
number of hours worked per week;
(B) the level of qualifying capital investments made if reporting on a
year within an investment period; and
(C) the amount of tax credit earned and applied during the previous
calendar year.
Sec. 2. 2010 Acts and Resolves No. 156, Sec. H.2, as amended by 2024 Acts
and Resolves, No. 144, Sec. 17, is further amended to read:
Sec. H.2 REPEAL
(a) Subchapter 11M of chapter 151 of Title 32 is repealed July 1, 2030
2034, and no credit under that section shall be available for any taxable year
beginning after June 30, 2030 2034.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027, and apply to taxable years
beginning on and after January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #385566 v.1